Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Article 3. Hot Springs State Park

§ 36-8-301.
Acceptance of Big Horn Hot Springs.

The state of Wyoming hereby accepts the lands granted by the act of congress of 1897 ceding to the state one (1) square mile in the northeast portion of the historic Shoshone Indian Reservation upon which is located the Big Horn Hot Springs and assents to all of the provisions of said act ceding the same.

History.

Laws 1897, ch. 48, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 2663; C.S. 1910, § 590; C.S. 1920, § 681; R.S. 1931, § 108-1501; C.S. 1945, § 19-701; W.S. 1957, § 36-157; 2022 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to administration of park, see §

36-4-122

.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added “historic” preceding “Shoshone.”

§ 36-8-302.
Name of park.

From and after the passage of this act, the land managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 in the northeast portion of the historic Shoshone Indian Reservation, upon which is located the Big Horn Hot Springs, is hereby declared to be and shall hereafter be known as the “Hot Springs State Park”. The department shall by rule specify the legal description of the state park.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 125, § 5; 1929, ch. 35, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 108-1505; C.S. 1945, § 19-712; W.S. 1957, § 36-158; 2010, ch. 11, § 2; 2022 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “managed by the department as of July 1, 2010” for “which was granted to the state of Wyoming by act of congress of 1897, which ceded to the state of Wyoming, one (1) square mile of land” and added the last sentence.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added “historic” preceding “Shoshone” in the first sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1929, ch. 35, § 3, makes the act effective from and after passage. Approved February 11, 1929.

§ 36-8-303.
Disposition of monies received.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, any and all monies which may be received for rentals of said lands or waters, or any portion thereof, or for the use of said water in any form or any portion thereof, and all money in any way derived from said state lands shall be paid into the state treasury as other monies belonging to the state and shall be credited by the state treasurer to the general fund. Funds received pursuant to W.S.

36-4-110

from state outdoor recreation areas or facilities on such lands shall be deposited and expended in accordance with W.S. 36-4-121(h).

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 39, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 703; C.S. 1910, § 594; Laws 1915, ch. 129, § 3; C.S. 1920, § 685; R.S. 1931, § 108-1510; C.S. 1945, § 19-704; W.S. 1957, § 36-159; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 2005, ch. 97, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

added the exception, added the last sentence, and made a stylistic change.

Laws 2005, ch. 97, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2005.

§ 36-8-304.
Public baths and public campgrounds.

The department of state parks and cultural resources shall retain one-fourth (1/4) of the water in the main or largest principal spring on the state land on the eastern bank of the Big Horn River with sufficient quantity of the land adjacent thereto, upon which suitable bathhouses may be constructed, which shall be open, with preference of use given free to persons who are indigent and suffering from ailments for which bathing in the waters of the Big Horn Hot Springs will afford relief. The department may make necessary rules and regulations governing free baths, the manner and time of bathing, and may require medical examination of applicants for baths. The bathhouse shall remain open not less than ten (10) hours a day each weekday and not less than six (6) hours on Sundays and holidays. The rules shall meet the minimum requirements of rules adopted by the department of agriculture governing public pools and spas. The department, in consultation with the commission, may set apart a suitable location and portion of the lands for public camping purposes but may contract for operation of any campgrounds by competitive sealed bid. Should the department, in consultation with the commission, operate any campground within Hot Springs State Park, the charges per night shall not be less than one-half (1/2) of the average charges imposed by private campground operators within a five (5) mile radius of the Hot Springs State Park. The balance of the water and lands may be leased by the department, in consultation with the commission, for a term not less than five (5) years nor longer than ninety-nine (99) years. The length of the term of each individual lease shall be determined by the department, in consultation with the commission, in accordance with the value of the improvements proposed and actually placed upon the leasehold. The department may by rule provide for special use permits for limited purposes. The department may make rules and regulations with respect to the erection of buildings and improvements upon the individual leaseholds and may prescribe the plans and specifications of, and the materials to be used in the buildings to be erected. The department, in consultation with the commission, in any lease may provide for such plans and buildings and such use thereof as will best carry out the purposes of this chapter in retaining the lands and waters thereon for the treatment and cure of diseases and the pleasure of the general public. The department, in consultation with the commission, may conduct through pipes or otherwise any portion of the waters of the hot springs reserved for free use under this section and to provide baths and bathhouses for the use of the water at such rental or rates as it prescribes.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 39, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 702; C.S. 1910, § 593; Laws 1915, ch. 129, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 684; Laws 1929, ch. 112, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 108-1508; C.S. 1945, § 19-703; W.S. 1957, § 36-160; Laws 1982, ch. 48, § 2; 1985, ch. 112, § 1; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1999, ch. 69, § 2; 2003, ch. 101, § 2.

Meaning of “commission.” —

The word “commission,” referred to throughout this section, apparently means the Wyoming parks and cultural resources commission.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2009, ch. 203, § 1, appropriates one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) from the budget reserve account to the state loan and investment board to be expended as provided in the act.

State could be held liable for its operation of state park. —

Where plaintiff park patron alleged state employees were negligent in approving the design and construction of the fountain in steam room in a state park, defendant State of Wyoming was not immune from suit because its activities fell within the statutory waiver of immunity for operation and maintenance of a public park. Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-39-106

and this section clearly provide that overseeing building construction on leased property and delivery of hot mineral water to lessees are parts of the State's operation of Hot Springs State Park.
Weber v. State, 2011 WY 127, 261 P.3d 225,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2011).

Cited in

Fugle v. Sublette Cnty. Sch. Dist. #9, 2015 WY 98, 2015
Wyo. LEXIS 113 (July 31, 2015).

§ 36-8-305.
Adjudication of water right for flow of Big Horn Hot Springs.

The legislature of Wyoming, by enacting W.S.

36-8-304

, appropriated and set aside for the state of Wyoming, board of charities and reform, the total flow of the Big Horn Hot Springs at Thermopolis, Wyoming, which was estimated to have been thirteen and one-tenth (13.1) cubic feet per second in 1896. That legislation was intended to be and is hereby declared to have been an application for a permit to appropriate in behalf of the board of charities and reform the total flow of Big Horn Hot Springs at Thermopolis, Wyoming, in compliance with W.S.

41-4-501

through

41-4-506

and

41-4-517

. The bathing, medicinal, irrigation uses, and the maintenance of flow of water over the terrace between the springs and the Big Horn River are all beneficial uses and are hereby declared to be beneficial uses. The state board of control is directed to adjudicate a water right in favor of the board of charities and reform, its successors and assignees, for the flow of the Big Horn Hot Springs at Thermopolis, Wyoming, with a priority date of February 17, 1899. The actual flow for adjudicated purposes shall be determined by the state board of control by established procedure. The department of state parks and cultural resources is designated as successor to the state board of charities and reform and the recreation commission under this section.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 101, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 36-106.1; Laws 1982, ch. 48, § 2; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1999, ch. 69, § 2; 2011, ch. 129, § 201.

Cross references. —

As to water rights generally, see chapter 3 of title 41.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, deleted the former sixth sentence, which read: “Effective April 1, 1990, the department of commerce is designated as successor to the state board of charities and reform and the recreation commission under this section,” deleted “Effective July 1, 1999” at the beginning of the last sentence, and “and the department of commerce” following “commission”; and made related changes.

§ 36-8-306.
Transfer of lands to United States.

Whenever in the judgment of the department, in consultation with the commission, the interest of the state will be advanced by granting, conveying or deeding to the United States of America any tract or tracts of land within the Hot Springs State Park not otherwise disposed of, as may be fit and proper or desirable by the United States government, for the construction and maintenance of a veterans soldiers’ hospital, sanitarium and recreation grounds, together with the free use of the mineral hot waters of the springs of the Hot Springs State Park, for the use of the United States of America in conducting the same, the department, in consultation with the commission, shall notify the board of land commissioners and the board may grant, convey and deed to the United States of America the designated lands. The president of the board of land commissioners and director are hereby authorized to make, execute and deliver all necessary instruments to complete such grants or conveyances.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 9, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 108-1515; C.S. 1945, § 19-715; W.S. 1957, § 36-161; Laws 1982, ch. 48, § 2; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1992, ch. 55, § 3.

Meaning of “commission.” —

See note under same catchline at §

36-8-304

.

Meaning of “department.” —

The word “department,” referred to twice in the first sentence, apparently means the department of state parks and cultural resources.

§ 36-8-307.
Control of use of lands; transfer of control to the Wyoming department of state parks and cultural resources.

The lands granted by the act of congress approved on the seventh day of June, A.D. 1897, ceding to the state of Wyoming certain lands in the northeastern portion of the historic Shoshone Indian Reservation upon which are located the Big Horn Hot Springs, are placed under control of the state board of charities and reform or its successor and are forever set aside for the treatment and care of diseases and for sanitary and charitable purposes.

As provided by W.S.

36-4-122

the department of state parks and cultural resources is designated as successor to the state board of charities and reform and recreation commission under this article effective July 1, 1999.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 39, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 700; C.S. 1910, § 591; C.S. 1920, § 682; R.S. 1931, § 108-1502; C.S. 1945, § 19-702; W.S. 1957, § 36-162; Laws 1982, ch. 48, § 2; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1999, ch. 69, § 2; 2022 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added “historic” preceding “Shoshone” in (a).

§ 36-8-308.
Inspection for health purposes.

The department, in consultation with the commission, may call upon the state department of health to inspect, examine and report fully upon the condition of any and all hotels, sanitariums and buildings, and all places and localities within the limits of the Big Horn Hot Springs state park and to enforce the health laws of the state and the applicable rules and regulations of the department. The department may call upon the state department of agriculture to inspect, examine and report fully upon the condition of any and all bathhouses within the limits of the Big Horn Hot Springs state park and to enforce the health laws of the state and the applicable rules and regulations.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 89, § 4; C.S. 1910, § 599; C.S. 1920, § 690; R.S. 1931, § 108-1503; C.S. 1945, § 19-708; W.S. 1957, § 36-163; Laws 1982, ch. 48, § 2; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2003, ch. 101, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to water quality, see §

35-11-301

et seq.

For present provisions pertaining to bathhouses, see §

35-28-101

et seq.

Meaning of “commission.” —

See note under same catchline at §

36-8-304

.

Meaning of “department.” —

The word “department,” referred to twice in this section, apparently means the department of state parks and cultural resources.

§ 36-8-309.
Rules and regulations; adoption, penalty for violation and cancellation of leases.

The department of state parks and cultural resources has full power, control and supervision over the Big Horn Hot Springs State Park, located in Hot Springs county, and all property thereon. The department may adopt rules and regulations for the government of the state park for the conservation of peace and good order within the park, and for the preservation of the property of the state therein, and of the property and people situated and residing or being therein, and to promote the well being of the people, and to declare what constitutes a nuisance within the state park. Any person who violates any rule or regulation adopted and published by the department is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not less than five dollars ($5.00) and not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00) or imprisoned for not more than six (6) months or both. Any offender convicted under this act may be permitted, in lieu of cash payment of a fine thus imposed, to work out the fine within the state park, at the rate of five dollars ($5.00) an hour until the amount of the fine is satisfied. Any circuit judge in the fifth judicial district has jurisdiction of all offenses under this article. A defendant convicted under this article has a right to appeal to the district court as provided for appeals from convictions in circuit courts and municipal courts. If any lessee of the state or of the department shall refuse to comply with the order, direction, rule or regulation of the department, or to obey any law of the state defining and punishing nuisances the department may immediately cancel the lease.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 89, § 3; C.S. 1910, § 598; C.S. 1920, § 689; Laws 1921, ch. 125, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 108-1512; C.S. 1945, § 19-707; W.S. 1957, § 36-164; Laws 1982, ch. 48, § 2; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1999, ch. 69, § 2; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in the fifth sentence, deleted “justice of the peace or” following “Any,” and substituted “the fifth judicial district” for “Hot Springs county,” and in the next-to-last sentence “circuit” for “justice of the peace.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

§ 36-8-310.
Rules and regulations; publication and distribution.

All rules and regulations adopted by the department of state parks and cultural resources for the government of the Big Horn Hot Springs State Park shall be published in pamphlet form and distributed to all officers and persons by law entitled to receive them, and to all lessees upon the state park.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 125, § 6; R.S. 1931, § 108-1504; C.S. 1945, § 19-713; W.S. 1957, § 36-165; Laws 1982, ch. 48, § 2; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1999, ch. 69, § 2.

§ 36-8-311.
Superintendent.

The department of state parks and cultural resources may employ a superintendent of the Big Horn Hot Springs State Park who shall have charge of all the state property at that park under the direction of the department.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 39, § 7; R.S. 1899, § 706; C.S. 1910, § 597; Laws 1915, ch. 129, § 4; C.S. 1920, § 688; Laws 1921, ch. 125, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 108-1506; C.S. 1945, § 19-706; W.S. 1957, § 36-166; Laws 1982, ch. 48, § 2; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1993, ch. 69, § 1; 1999, ch. 69, § 2.

§ 36-8-312.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 69, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to deputy sheriffs, see §

18-3-602

.

Editor's Notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1921, ch. 125, § 3, related to the appointment of deputies.

§ 36-8-313.
Attendant for free bathhouse.

The department may employ an attendant at the free bathhouse of the Big Horn Hot Springs whose duties shall be specified by the department.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 89, § 6; C.S. 1910, § 601; C.S. 1920, § 692; R.S. 1931, § 108-1509; C.S. 1945, § 19-710; W.S. 1957, § 36-168; Laws 1982, ch. 48, § 2; 1990, ch. 44, § 2.

§ 36-8-314.
Gambling prohibited; sale of alcoholic beverages regulated; violations.

Gambling in any form is prohibited within the park. The sale of alcoholic liquor except for medicinal purposes shall be subject to any terms, conditions, regulations and license fees as the department in consultation with the commission may determine and prescribe in addition to any requirement for the procurement of a license prescribed by law. Any violation of the provisions of this section or any term, condition or regulation prescribed by the department shall be sufficient ground for the department to cancel the lease of any violator, who shall be subject to expulsion from the state land in addition to any penalty herein prescribed, or prescribed by the laws of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 39, § 6; R.S. 1899, § 705; C.S. 1910, § 596; C.S. 1920, § 687; R.S. 1931, § 108-1511; C.S. 1945, § 19-705; W.S. 1957, § 36-169; Laws 1982, ch. 48, § 2; 1990, ch. 44, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to gambling generally, see §

6-7-101

et seq.

As to alcoholic beverages generally, see title 12.

Meaning of “commission.” —

See note under same catchline at §

36-8-304

.

Meaning of “department.” —

The word “department,” referred to in this section, apparently means the department of state parks and cultural resources.

§ 36-8-315.
Penalty for public health violations.

Any person who maintains a filthy, unwholesome or offensive house, hotel, bathhouse, sanitarium, dwelling, stable, privy or privy vault, drainpipe or sewer, which is a menace to the public health, or who fails to comply with any order, rule, direction or regulation of the department of state parks and cultural resources, the state department of agriculture or the state department of health is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be fined in any sum not exceeding seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) or imprisoned in the county jail for not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 89, § 5; C.S. 1910, § 600; C.S. 1920, § 691; R.S. 1931, § 108-1513; C.S. 1945, § 19-709; W.S. 1957, § 36-170; Laws 1982, ch. 48, § 2; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1999, ch. 69, § 2; 2003, ch. 101, § 2.

§ 36-8-316.
Liability and penalty for livestock roaming at will.

It shall be unlawful for any person, owner or custodian of any livestock to permit the same to roam at will over, upon or across any portion of the lands owned by the state in Hot Springs county and known as the Hot Springs State Reserve. Any owner, drover or other person or persons in charge of loose animals or livestock of any description who shall drive or trail the same upon, across or through any portion of said reserve, shall be liable for any and all damage resulting therefrom. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100.00). In addition to the foregoing penalty the owner of any such loose animals or livestock shall be liable for any damage caused on said reserve by any such animals or livestock, and the superintendent of said reserve is hereby authorized to seize and restrain at some suitable place any such animals or livestock, and the state shall have a lien thereon for the amount of any fine imposed against the owner and for all damages and costs, including the care of such loose animals or livestock, to be collected in a civil action to be brought in the name of the state in any court of competent jurisdiction. The judgment awarding foreclosure of any such lien shall direct the sale of said loose animals or livestock in the manner now provided by law for the sale of personal property upon execution.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 48, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 693; R.S. 1931, § 108-1514; C.S. 1945, § 19-714; W.S. 1957, § 36-171.

Cross references. —

As to sale of personal property upon execution, see §§

1-17-418

and 34.1-9-501.

As to offenses concerning livestock and other animals, see chapter 30 of title 11.

§ 36-8-317.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1982, ch. 48, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1921, ch. 125, § 4, related to the erection and maintenance of a jail for offenders under this article.

§ 36-8-318.
Bond issue to upgrade facilities; authority generally. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 139,§ 1; W.S. 1957, § 36-172.1; Laws 1982, ch. 48,§§ 2, 4; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1998, ch. 13, § 1; 1999, ch. 69, § 2; repealed by 2019 ch. 35, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 36-8-319.
Bond issue to upgrade facilities; investment by state treasurer. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 139,§ 2; W.S. 1957, § 36-172.2; 1998, ch. 13, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 35, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 36-8-320.
Bond issue to upgrade facilities; regulation of loans. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 139,§ 3; W.S. 1957, § 36-172.3; Laws 1969, ch. 82,§ 1; 1982, ch. 48, § 2; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1998, ch. 13, § 1; 1999, ch. 69, § 2; repealed by 2019 ch. 35, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.